California statutes. Education Code
The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100560.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 1A at the November 3, 1998, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 68.1. KINDERGARTEN–UNIVERSITY PUBLIC EDUCATION FACILITIES BOND ACT OF 2002 [100600. - 100760.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [100600. - 100603.]

100600.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Kindergarten–University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100601.

The incorporation of, or reference to, any provision of California statutory law in this part includes all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100603.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of thirteen billion fifty million dollars ($13,050,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Sections 100644 and 100755, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this part and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established by Section 15909 or the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353, as the case may be, at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, and approved in Prop. 47 on Nov. 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade [100610. - 100646.]



  ARTICLE 1. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Program Provisions [100610. - 100620.]

100610.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 100625) shall be deposited in the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, which is established in Section 17070.40, and shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100615.

All moneys deposited in the 2002 State Facilities Fund for the purposes of this chapter shall be available and, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, are hereby appropriated to provide aid to school districts, county superintendents of schools, and county boards of education of the state in accordance with the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10), as set forth in Section 100620, to provide funds to repay any money advanced or loaned to the 2002 State School Facilities Fund under any act of the Legislature, together with interest provided for in that act, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100620.

(a) The proceeds from the sale of bonds, issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter, shall be allocated in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The amount of three billion four hundred fifty million dollars ($3,450,000,000) for new construction of school facilities of applicant school districts under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for those school districts that file an application with the Office of Public School Construction after February 1, 2002, including, but not limited to, hardship applications.

(A) Of the amount allocated pursuant to this paragraph, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available for providing school facilities to charter schools pursuant to a statute enacted after the effective date of the act enacting this section.

(B) If the Housing and Emergency Shelter Trust Fund Act of 2002 is submitted to the voters at the November 5, 2002, general election and fails passage by the voters, of the amount allocated pursuant to this paragraph, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available for the purposes of Sections 51451.5, 51453, and 51455 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The amount of one billion four hundred million dollars ($1,400,000,000) for the modernization of school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for those school districts that file an application with the Office of Public School Construction after February 1, 2002, including, but not limited to, hardship applications.

(3) The amount of two billion nine hundred million dollars ($2,900,000,000) for new construction of school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for those school districts that have filed an application with the Office of Public School Construction on or before February 1, 2002, including, but not limited to, hardship applications. If the amount made available for purposes of this paragraph is not needed and expended for the purposes of this paragraph, the State Allocation Board may allocate the remainder of these funds for purposes of paragraph (1).

(4) The amount of one billion nine hundred million dollars ($1,900,000,000) for the modernization of school facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10, for those school districts that have filed an application with the Office of Public School Construction on or before February 1, 2002, including, but not limited to, hardship applications. If the amount made available for purposes of this paragraph is not needed and expended for the purposes of this paragraph, the State Allocation Board may allocate these funds for purposes of paragraph (2).

(5) The amount of one billion seven hundred million dollars ($1,700,000,000) for deposit into the 2002 Critically Overcrowded School Facilities Account established within the 2002 State School Facilities Fund pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 17078.10, for the purposes set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17078.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 relating to critically overcrowded schools, including, but not limited to, hardship applications, and any other new construction or modernization projects as authorized pursuant to Section 17078.30.

(6) The amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for the purposes set forth in Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 17077.40) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10 relating to joint-use projects, including, but not limited to, hardship applications.

(b) School districts may use funds allocated pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (4) of subdivision (a) only for one or more of the following purposes in accordance with Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10:

(1) The purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and related costs.

(2) Construction projects or the purchase of furniture or equipment designed to increase school security or playground safety.

(3) The identification, assessment, or abatement in school facilities of hazardous asbestos.

(4) Project funding for high priority roof replacement projects.

(5) Any other modernization of facilities pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a) may, also, be utilized to provide new construction grants for eligible applicant county boards of education under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for funding classrooms for severely handicapped pupils, or for funding classrooms for county community school pupils.

(d) (1) The Legislature may amend this section to adjust the funding amounts specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a), only by either of the following methods:

(A) By a statute, passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the respective journals, by not less than two-thirds of the membership in each house concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this chapter.

(B) By a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the voters.

(2) Amendments pursuant to this subdivision may adjust the amounts to be expended pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a), but may not increase or decrease the total amount to be expended pursuant to that subdivision.

(e) From the total amounts set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a), a total of no more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be used for the costs of energy conservation adjustments authorized pursuant to Section 17077.35.

(f) Funds available pursuant to this section may be used for acquisition of school facilities authorized pursuant to Section 17280.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Fiscal Provisions [100625. - 100646.]

100625.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100600), bonds in the total amount of eleven billion four hundred million dollars ($11,400,000,000) not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 100644, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 15909 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100627.

The State School Building Finance Committee, established by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation, and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with and provide advice to the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigating committee on the subject of this chapter and, as that committee, shall have the powers granted to, and duties imposed upon, those committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide assistance to the committee as it may require. The Attorney General of the state is the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100630.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, except Section 16727 of the Government Code, apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated into this chapter as though set forth in full within this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Allocation Board is designated the “board” for purposes of administering the 2002 State School Facilities Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100632.

Upon request of the State Allocation Board from time to time, supported by a statement of the apportionments made and to be made for the purposes described in Sections 100615 and 100620, the State School Building Finance Committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to fund the apportionments and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to fund those apportionments progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100634.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100635.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 100640, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100636.

The State Allocation Board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100638.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100640.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 2002 State School Facilities Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100642.

All money deposited in the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100644.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100646.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Higher Education Facilities [100650. - 100760.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [100650. - 100650.]

100650.

(a) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and their respective off-campus centers.

(b) The 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury for deposit of funds from the proceeds of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the
 purpose of providing funds to aid the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 36.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Provisions Applicable to the University of California and the Hastings College of the Law [100652. - 100652.]

100652.

(a) From the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 100700), the sum of four hundred eight million two hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($408,216,000) shall be deposited in the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund for the purposes of this article. When appropriated, these funds shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this article.

(b) The purposes of this article include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of the University of California and the college named in Section 92200.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this article may be used to
 fund construction on existing campuses, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, construction of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental), the renovation and reconstruction of facilities, site acquisition, the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an average useful life of 10 years; and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings for facilities of the University of California and the college named in Section 92200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 37.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Program Provisions Applicable to the California State University [100653. - 100653.]

100653.

(a) From the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 100700), the sum of four hundred ninety-five million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($495,932,000) shall be deposited in the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund for the purposes of this article. When appropriated, these funds shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this article.

(b) The purposes of this article include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of the California State University.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this article may be used to fund construction on existing campuses, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, construction of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental), the renovation and reconstruction of facilities, site acquisition, the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an average useful life of 10 years; and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings for facilities of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Program Provisions Applicable to the California Community Colleges [100654. - 100654.]

100654.

(a) From the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 100700), the sum of seven hundred forty-five million eight hundred fifty-three thousand dollars ($745,853,000) shall be deposited in the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund for the purposes of this article. When appropriated, these funds shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this article.

(b) The purposes of this article include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of the California Community Colleges.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for the purposes of this article may be used to fund construction on existing campuses, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, construction of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental), the renovation and reconstruction of facilities, site acquisition, the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an average useful life of 10 years; and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings for facilities of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Higher Education Fiscal Provisions [100700. - 100760.]

100700.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100600), bonds in the total amount of one billion six hundred fifty million dollars ($1,650,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 100755, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds
 as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 21.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, and approved in Prop. 47 on Nov. 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

100710.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, except Section 16727 of the Government Code, apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated into this chapter as though set forth in full within this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be available for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, for the construction on existing or new campuses, and their respective off-campus centers and joint use and intersegmental facilities, as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 38.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100720.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments for the purposes described in this chapter that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the purposes described in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100725.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100730.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 100745, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100735.

The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 100710, may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 100710, shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100740.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100745.

(a) For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in this chapter by the University of California, the college named in Section 92200, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by the five-year capital outlay plan. Requests forwarded by a university or college shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, in the judgment of the particular university or college, seismic hazards in buildings identified as high priority by the university or college. Requests forwarded by the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by a five-year capital outlay plan reflecting the needs and priorities of the community college system, prioritized on a statewide basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 39.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100750.

All money deposited in the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100755.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100760.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 30.   Approved in Proposition 47 at the November 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 68.2. KINDERGARTEN–UNIVERSITY PUBLIC EDUCATION FACILITIES BOND ACT OF 2004 [100800. - 100960.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [100800. - 100803.]

100800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   Approved in Proposition 55 at the March 2, 2004, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100801.

The incorporation of, or reference to, any provision of California statutory law in this part includes all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   Approved in Proposition 55 at the March 2, 2004, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100803.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of twelve billion three hundred million dollars ($12,300,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Sections 100844 and 100955, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this part and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee established by Section 15909 or the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353, as the case may be, at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   Approved in Proposition 55 at the March 2, 2004, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade [100810. - 100846.]



  ARTICLE 1. Kindergarten Through 12th Grade School Facilities Program Provisions [100810. - 100820.]

100810.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 100825) shall be deposited in the 2004 State School Facilities Fund, which is established in Section 17070.40, and shall be allocated by the State Allocation Board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 31.   Approved in Proposition 55 at the March 2, 2004, election.)
-------------------------------------------

100815.
